District of Columbia statutes.
1-621.02

District health benefits.

The District shall provide health benefits as set forth in § 1-621.05 to all employees of the District first employed after September 30, 1987, except those specifically excluded by law or by rule.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2102
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(d), 34 DCR 5079
Health Care Benefits Expansion: See § 32-701 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 1-622.2.
This section is referenced in § 1-621.11.
Health care benefits expansion, domestic partnerships, see § 32-701 et seq.